New Jersey, session 222, S1487.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An institution of higher education or a proprietary institution licensed to offer academic degrees which receives notice from the United States Department of Education that a former or current student is approved for borrower defense loan discharge pursuant to federal law shall promptly notify the Executive Director of the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority. The institution shall also inform the executive director if the student was a resident of the State at the time of the students enrollment in the institution. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.